Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-237
Expenses of administration; how paid.

All expenses incidental to the administration of sections 71-225 to 71-237 shall be paid from the funds of the Board of Barber Examiners in the manner and form governing other expenditures of that board.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 11, p. 558.